District of Columbia statutes.
2-808

Enforcement.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, or other official having jurisdiction in the premises, shall enforce this chapter, take necessary precautions to protect the public, and ensure that the pavement of any street, sidewalk, avenue, or alley disturbed or damaged is restored to its prior condition.

History

Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1265, Pub. L. 105-225, § 508

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1058.